Washington statutes.
RCW 16.49.008

Application.

(1) This chapter does not apply to the slaughter and preparation of one thousand or fewer pastured chickens in a calendar year by the agricultural producer of the chickens for the sale of whole raw chickens by the producer directly to the ultimate consumer at the producer's farm.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "chicken" means the species Gallus domesticus.

[ 2003 c 397 s 1.]